Washington statutes.
RCW 39.19.150

Local government may petition for reconsideration of business certification.

(1) Any city, county, town, special purpose district, public corporation created by the state, municipal corporation, or quasi-municipal corporation having reason to believe that a particular minority and women's business enterprise should not have been certified under RCW 39.19.140 may petition the office for reconsideration. The basis for the petition may be one or more of the following:

(a) The office's rules or regulations were improperly applied; or

(b) Material facts relating to the minority and women's business enterprise's certification application to the office are untrue.

(2) The petitioner shall carry the burden of persuasion. The affected minority or women's business enterprise shall receive notice of the petition and an opportunity to respond.

(3) After reviewing the information presented in support of and in opposition to the petition, the office shall issue a written decision, granting or denying the petition. If the office grants the petition, it may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew the certification or impose sanctions under this chapter as appropriate.

(4) The office's decision on a petition is administratively final and the rights of appeal set out in the office regulations shall apply. A certification shall remain in effect while a petition is pending.

[ 1987 c 328 s 10.]